Washington statutes.
RCW 18.145.100

Renewals—Late fees—Reinstatement.

The director shall establish by rule the requirements, including continuing education requirements, and the renewal and late renewal fees for certification. Failure to renew the certificate on or before the expiration date cancels all privileges granted by the certificate. If an individual desires to reinstate a certificate which had not been renewed for three years or more, the individual shall satisfactorily demonstrate continued competence in conformance with standards determined by the director.

[ 2010 c 49 s 2; 1989 c 382 s 11.]